Montana, session 2025, SB207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Digital public squares -- prohibition against banning access --
definitions. (1) A business or entity providing a digital public square may not limit or abridge an individual
user's right to assemble or exercise freedom of speech in a digital public square through digital prohibition, as
defined in this section, unless in violation of state or federal laws.
(2) A business or entity providing a digital public square may not censor user-created content
through any means, including prohibiting other users from viewing user-created content.
(3) A business or entity may not create community standards, contracts, or terms and conditions
that violate subsection (2) or (3).
(4) A business or entity in violation of subsection (2), (3), or (4) may be liable for actual and
punitive damages in an action brought by a user of a digital public square.
(5) A business or entity is not in violation of subsection (2) if it offers advertisements to users of a
digital public square.
(6) A digital public square may be terminated by the business or entity providing the digital public
square.
(7) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Deplatforming" means removing a user of a digital public square without the request of the
user.
(b) "Digital prohibition" means banning, deplatforming, or censoring a user of a digital public
square through any means, including but not limited to the use of shadow banning, algorithms, monitoring,
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 207

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 207.1
intimidation, defamation, and throttling.
(c) "Digital public square" means an online public platform provided free of charge to some or all
users.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 30, chapter 14, and the provisions of Title 30, chapter 14, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 207